Hawaii statutes.
§291C-47 No-passing zones. (a) The
director of transportation is authorized to and the counties by ordinance with
respect to highways under their respective jurisdictions may establish
no-passing zones where overtaking and passing or driving to the left of the
roadway would be especially hazardous and shall by appropriate signs or
markings on the highway establish or indicate the beginning and the end of a
no-passing zone and may place intermediate signs establishing or indicating the
continued existence of a no-passing zone. Signs or markings placed by the
director of transportation establishing the zone and signs or markings
indicating the zone established by ordinance shall be clearly visible to an
ordinarily observant person and every driver of a vehicle shall obey the
directions thereof.

(b) Where signs or markings are in place to
define a no-passing zone as set forth in subsection (a) no driver shall at any
time drive on the left side of the roadway within such no-passing zone or on
the left side of any pavement striping designed to mark such no-passing zone
throughout its length.

(c) This section does not apply under the
conditions described in section 291C-41(a)(2), nor to the driver of a vehicle
turning left into or from an alley, private road, or driveway. [L 1971, c 150,
pt of §1; am L 1974, c 133, §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next